Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 3,483,773
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 7,928,045
(3) Elections Division,
distributions to counties ........... $ 879,248
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Secretary of State, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 19,425,598
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 1,183,925
(3) Audits Division.......................... $ 23,300,010
(4) Archives Division ...................... $ 8,615,793
(5) Corporation Division................. $ 12,044,063
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,393,665 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5034 (HB 5034-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5034 (HB 5034-A) Page 2